Delaware, session 153, HB254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 9006D, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 9006D. Division of Diversity, Equity and Inclusion. People and Culture. (a) The Division of Diversity, Equity and Inclusion People and Culture of the Department of Human Resources is hereby established having powers, duties and functions as follows: (1) The Division shall assume all responsibilities and oversight previously assigned to the Governorâs Council on Equal Employment Opportunity. (2) The Chief Diversity Officer shall have the following responsibilities: a. Guide efforts to define, assess, and cultivate access, diversity, equity, and inclusion throughout state government. b. Provide analysis of various forms of institutional data to benchmark and promote accountability for the diversity mission of state agencies. c. Promote and provide education to foster an awareness and understanding of the various laws, regulations, and policies regarding nondiscrimination. d. Collaborate with state agencies to identify policies and practices supporting the recruitment and retention of employees from historically underrepresented groups. e. Develop diversity metrics and processes to assess diversity, equity, and inclusion efforts. (b) The Chief Diversity Officer shall assume such other powers, duties and functions as the Secretary of the Department of Human Resources may assign that are not otherwise inconsistent with the laws of this State. Section 2. Amend Â§ 1314, Title 4 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 1314. Oversight Committee; annual report by the Commissioner. (a) The Delaware Marijuana Control Act Oversight Committee is established to evaluate and make recommendations regarding the implementation of this chapter. (1) The Oversight Committee shall consist of 15 members who possess the qualifications and are appointed as follows: f. The Chief Diversity Officer of the Division of Diversity, Equity and Inclusion, People and Culture, or the Chief Diversity Officerâs designee. Section 3. Amend Â§ 9009D, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 9009D. Office of Womenâs Advancement and Advocacy. (c) The Office of Womenâs Advancement and Advocacy may collaborate with the Division of Diversity, Equity and Inclusion People and Culture or any other state agency for assistance, information or data that may be necessary to fulfill its responsibilities in subsection (b).